Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1133
Special education programs; student less than five years of age; school district; amount paid to service agency; determination.

Each school district shall pay an amount equal to the average per pupil cost of the service agency of the preceding year or the cost as agreed upon pursuant to the contract to the agency providing the educational program for every child with a disability who is less than five years of age, who is a resident of the district, and who is attending an educational program not operated by the school district, including programs operated by the State Department of Education, the Department of Health and Human Services, and any other service agency whose programs are approved by the State Department of Education.

Laws 1978, LB 889, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-646.03;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 26;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3326;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 815;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 821;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 23.